Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1755.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 113 of Title 76, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Religious organization” means any church, seminary,


synagogue, temple, mosque, religious order, religious corporation,


association, or society, whose identity is distinctive in terms of


common religious creed, beliefs, doctrines, practices, or rituals of


any faith or denomination, including any organization qualifying as


a church or religious organization under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(d)


of the United States Internal Revenue Code; and


2. “Security personnel” means an individual:



Req. No. 2179 Page 1


a. whom a religious organization hires to provide


security services for the organization, or


b. who is a volunteer of a religious organization whose


duties include providing security services to the


organization.


B. A religious organization or security personnel of a


religious organization shall be immune from civil liability for any


act or omission by the security personnel that results in death,


damage, or injury if the security personnel was acting in the course


and scope of employment or volunteer duties to provide security


services to the organization, including an intentional act or an act


involving possession or use of a firearm.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2179 CN 1/14/2026 2:56:51 PM



















Req. No. 2179 Page 2